District of Columbia statutes.
8-413

Reports of pesticide accidents or losses.

The Mayor may require the reporting of significant pesticide accidents or incidents to a designated District agency.

History

Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-70, § 14, 24 DCR 6867

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-751.13.